Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 5. Landlord Remedies.
§ 55.1-1250.
Landlord’s acceptance of rent with reservation; tenant’s right of redemption.

No landlord may accept full payment of rent, as well as any damages, money judgment, award of attorney fees, and court costs, and receive an order of possession from a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to an unlawful detainer action filed under Article 13 (§

8.01-124

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 8.01 and proceed with eviction under §

55.1-1245

, unless there are bases for the entry of an order of possession other than nonpayment of rent stated in the unlawful detainer action filed by the landlord. However, a landlord may accept partial payment of rent and other amounts owed by the tenant to the landlord and receive an order of possession from a court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to an unlawful detainer action filed under Article 13 (§

8.01-124

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 8.01 and proceed with eviction for nonpayment of rent under §

55.1-1245

, provided that the landlord has stated in a written notice to the tenant that any and all amounts owed to the landlord by the tenant, including payment of any rent, damages, money judgment, award of attorney fees, and court costs, would be accepted with reservation and would not constitute a waiver of the landlord’s right to evict the tenant from the dwelling unit. Such notice may be included in a written termination notice given by the landlord to the tenant in accordance with § 55.1-1245, and if so included, nothing herein shall be construed by a court of law or otherwise as requiring such landlord to give the tenant subsequent written notice. Such notice shall include the following language: “Any partial payment of rent made before or after a judgment of possession is ordered will not prevent your landlord from taking action to evict you. However, full payment of all amounts you owe the landlord, including all rent as contracted for in the rental agreement that is owed to the landlord as of the date payment is made, as well as any damages, money judgment, award of attorney fees, and court costs made at least 48 hours before the scheduled eviction will cause the eviction to be canceled, unless there are bases for the entry of an order of possession other than nonpayment of rent stated in the unlawful detainer action filed by the landlord.” If the landlord elects to seek possession of the dwelling unit pursuant to §

8.01-126

, the landlord shall provide a copy of this notice to the court for service to the tenant, along with the summons for unlawful detainer. If the dwelling unit is a public housing unit or other housing unit subject to regulation by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, nothing in this section shall be construed to require that written notice be given to any public agency paying a portion of the rent under the rental agreement. If a landlord enters into a new written rental agreement with the tenant prior to eviction, an order of possession obtained prior to the entry of such new rental agreement is not enforceable. Notwithstanding the requirements of this section, a landlord with four or fewer rental dwelling units, or up to a 10 percent interest in four or fewer rental dwelling units, may limit a tenant’s use of the right of redemption to once per lease period, provided that the landlord provides written notice of such limitation to the tenant.

The tenant may pay or present to the court a redemption tender for payment of all rent due and owing as of the return date, including late charges, attorney fees, and court costs, at or before the first return date on an action for unlawful detainer.If the tenant presents a redemption tender to the court at the return date, the court shall continue the action for unlawful detainer for 10 days following the return date for payment to the landlord of all rent due and owing as of the return date, including late charges, attorney fees, and court costs, and dismiss the action upon such payment. Should the landlord not receive full payment of all rent due and owing as of the return date, including late charges, attorney fees, and court costs, within 10 days of the return date, the court shall, without further evidence, grant to the landlord judgment for all amounts due and immediate possession of the premises. For purposes of this section, “redemption tender” means a written commitment to pay all rent due and owing as of the return date, including late charges, attorney fees, and court costs, by a local government or nonprofit entity within 10 days of such return date.

In cases of unlawful detainer, a tenant, or any third party on behalf of a tenant, may pay the landlord or the landlord’s attorney or pay into court all (i) rent due and owing as of the court date as contracted for in the rental agreement, (ii) other charges and fees as contracted for in the rental agreement, (iii) late charges contracted for in the rental agreement and as provided by law, (iv) reasonable attorney fees as contracted for in the rental agreement and as provided by law, and (v) costs of the proceeding as provided by law, at which time the unlawful detainer proceeding shall be dismissed, unless there are bases for the entry of an order of possession other than nonpayment of rent stated in the unlawful detainer action filed by the landlord.

If such payment has not been made as of the return date for the unlawful detainer, the tenant, or any third party on behalf of the tenant, may pay to the landlord, the landlord’s attorney, or the court all amounts claimed on the summons in unlawful detainer, including current rent, damages, late charges, costs of court, any civil recovery, attorney fees, and sheriff fees, including the sheriff fees for service of the writ of eviction if payment is made after issuance of the writ, no less than 48 hours before the date and time scheduled by the officer to whom the writ of eviction has been delivered to be executed. Upon receipt of such payment, the landlord, or the landlord’s attorney or managing agent, shall promptly notify the officer to whom the writ of eviction has been delivered to be executed that the execution of the writ of eviction shall be canceled. If the landlord has actual knowledge that the tenant has made such payment and willfully fails to provide such notification, such act may be deemed to be a violation of §

55.1-1243.1

. In addition, the landlord shall transmit to the court a notice of satisfaction of any money judgment in accordance with §

8.01-454

.

Upon receiving a written request from the tenant, the landlord, or the landlord’s attorney or managing agent, shall provide to the tenant a written statement of all amounts owed by the tenant to the landlord so that the tenant may pay the exact amount necessary for the tenant to exercise his right of redemption pursuant to this section. Any payments made by the tenant shall be by cashier’s check, certified check, or money order. A court shall not issue a writ of eviction on any judgment for possession that has expired or has been marked as satisfied.

History.

2003, c. 427, § 55-248.34:1; 2006, c. 667; 2008, c. 489; 2010, c. 793; 2012, c. 788; 2013, c. 563; 2014, c. 813; 2018, cc. 220, 233; 2019, cc. 28, 43, 712; 2020, c. 1231; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 410.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, cc. 28 and
43 amended
§ 55-248.34:1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “the landlord’s attorney” for “his attorney” in the first sentence and adding the second and third sentences in subsection D.

Acts
2019, cc. 355 and
356, cl. 7 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any tenant who has exercised the right of redemption pursuant to
§ 55-248.34:1 [now this section] of the Code of Virginia at any time before July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 410 cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development shall convene a stakeholder group consisting of landlords, property managers, and tenants, as well as attorneys knowledgeable of the Virginia Residential Landlord and Tenant Act ( §

55.1-1200

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and other relevant provisions of the Code of Virginia related to eviction procedures in residential landlord and tenant cases, to provide input to the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development (the Director) regarding the development of the sample termination notice required to be developed by the Director pursuant to
§

36-139

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “ §

55.1-1243.1

” was substituted for “ §

55.1-1243

” to conform with Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 403 and
404.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1231, effective April 22, 2020, substituted “late charges” for “late fees” in the second sentence of subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 410, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

§ 55.1-1251.
Remedy after termination.

If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord may have a claim for possession and for rent and a separate claim for actual damages for breach of the rental agreement, reasonable attorney fees as provided in §

55.1-1245

, and the cost of service of any notice under §

55.1-1245

or

55.1-1415

or process by a sheriff or private process server, which cost shall not exceed the amount authorized by §

55.1-1247

, and such claims may be enforced, without limitation, by initiating an action for unlawful entry or detainer. Actual damages for breach of the rental agreement may include a claim for rent that would have accrued until the expiration of the term of the rental agreement or until a tenancy pursuant to a new rental agreement commences, whichever occurs first, provided that nothing contained in this section shall diminish the duty of the landlord to mitigate actual damages for breach of the rental agreement. In obtaining post-possession judgments for actual damages as defined in this section, the landlord shall not seek a judgment for accelerated rent through the end of the term of the tenancy.

In any unlawful detainer action brought by the landlord, this section shall not be construed to prevent the landlord from being granted by the court a simultaneous judgment for money due and for possession of the premises without a credit for any security deposit. Upon the tenant vacating the premises either voluntarily or by a writ of eviction, security deposits shall be credited to the tenant’s account by the landlord in accordance with the requirements of §

55.1-1226

.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.35; 1981, c. 539; 1988, c. 68; 1989, c. 383; 1996, c. 326; 2000, c. 760; 2001, c. 524; 2019, cc. 180, 700, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, cc. 180 and
700 amended
§ 55-248.35 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2019, c. 712,
the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “writ of eviction” for “writ of possession” in the second paragraph.

Acts 2019, cc. 180 and 700 amended § 55-248.35 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “writ of eviction” for “writ of possession” in the second paragraph.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, cl. 16, as amended by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, and as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. II, c. 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“a. That upon enactment of this act and through June 30, 2022, no landlord shall terminate a residential tenancy, or take any action to obtain possession of a dwelling unit, for non-payment of rent, if the eligible tenant has qualified for unemployment benefits or experienced a reduction in household income, incurred significant costs, or experienced other financial hardship during or due, directly or indirectly, to the coronavirus pandemic, except as follows:

“1. If rent is unpaid when due, or if a payment under the terms of a payment plan is unpaid when due, the landlord shall, pursuant to §

55.1-1202

, Code of Virginia, serve a written notice on the tenant that informs the tenant of the Virginia Rent Relief Program and provides the website address and statewide telephone number for that program. The written notice shall also provide information on how to reach 2-1-1 Virginia to determine whether there are any other available federal, state and local rent relief programs.

“2. The written notice shall also inform the tenant that the owner, landlord, or owner’s licensed agent shall apply for rental assistance on the tenant’s behalf within 14 days of serving the notice on the tenant, unless the tenant pays in full, enters into a payment plan or informs the landlord that they have already applied for rental assistance. The landlord shall apply for rental assistance on behalf of the tenant no later than 14 days after serving the written notice on the tenant, unless they receive the full amount owed by the tenant or confirmation from the tenant that the tenant has applied for rental assistance before the 14th day, or they have entered into a payment plan with the tenant. If the tenant has applied for rental assistance, the landlord shall cooperate with the tenant’s application, by providing all information and documentation required to complete the application, including but not limited to the W-9 form and any supporting affidavits. In an initial application, if the landlord or the tenant does not receive written approval from the Virginia Rent Relief Program or any other federal, state, or local rent relief program within forty-five days of when a completed application for assistance is made by the tenant or the landlord, the landlord may proceed to obtain possession of the premise as provided in §

55.1-1251

. For any subsequent application, if the landlord or tenant does not receive written approval from the Virginia Rent Relief Program or any other federal, state, or local rent relief program within fourteen days of submission of the subsequent completed application, the landlord may proceed to obtain possession of the premises as provided in §

55.1-1251

. If a tenant who has not paid in full or entered into a payment plan with the landlord within 14 days after the written notice is served refuses to apply for rental assistance and also refuses to cooperate with the landlord in providing information and documentation required to complete the application made by the landlord, or if such tenant is determined ineligible for rental assistance, or there are no longer funds available through the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act (P.L. 116-136) and from the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA) (P.L. 117-2) for rental assistance through the Virginia Rent Relief program, the landlord may take action to obtain possession of the tenant’s dwelling unit as provided in § 55.1-1251, Code of Virginia.

“b. If a landlord reports to a consumer reporting agency or debt collector regarding a tenant who is participating in the repayment plan or receiving assistance from a federal, state, or local rent relief program, the landlord shall report the account as ‘current’ in accordance with the Public Law 116-136: Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act.

“c. If a tenant is complying with a written payment plan with the landlord or has resolved any non-payment of rent, the landlord cannot take any action to obtain possession of a dwelling unit for non-payment of rent.

“d. Nothing in this section relieves either the landlord or the tenant from their obligations to maintain the dwelling as those obligations are set forth in Article 2 and Article 3 of Chapter 12 of Title 55.1.

“e. Nothing in this section shall void any judgment for possession validly obtained by a landlord prior to the effective date of this act; however, a landlord shall not initiate, maintain, or advance any legal process to obtain possession of a dwelling unit for non-payment of the rent unless the landlord complies with the provisions of this section.

“f. Notwithstanding any other language to the contrary, should the Governor declare a state of emergency pursuant to §

44-146.17

of the Code of Virginia in response to a communicable disease of public health threat as defined in § 44-146.16 of the Code of Virginia, and if that declaration specifically provides that the eighth enactment of Chapter 552 of the Acts of Assembly Special Session I shall supersede the language set forth in enactment sixteen of this act then this sixteenth enactment shall not be effective so long as such a declared state of emergency remains in effect.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, cl. 26, as amended by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, and as added by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. II, c. 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “That the provisions of the sixteenth enactment of this act shall expire at midnight on June 30, 2022 unless: 1) there are no funds available for the Virginia Rent Relief program from the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security (CARES) Act (P.L. 116-136) and from the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (ARPA) (P.L. 117-2), or 2) the provisions of paragraph f. of the sixteenth enactment of this act becomes effective.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1252.
Recovery of possession limited.

A landlord may not recover or take possession of the dwelling unit (i) by willful diminution of services to the tenant by interrupting or causing the interruption of an essential service required by the rental agreement or (ii) by refusal to permit the tenant access to the unit unless such refusal is pursuant to a court order for possession.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.36; 1978, c. 520; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1253.
Periodic tenancy; holdover remedies.

The landlord or the tenant may terminate a week-to-week tenancy by serving a written notice on the other at least seven days prior to the next rent due date. The landlord or the tenant may terminate a month-to-month tenancy by serving a written notice on the other at least 30 days prior to the next rent due date, unless the rental agreement provides for a different notice period. The landlord and the tenant may agree in writing to an early termination of a rental agreement. In the event that no such agreement is reached, the provisions of §

55.1-1251

shall control.

If the tenant remains in possession without the landlord’s consent after expiration of the term of the rental agreement or its termination, the landlord may bring an action for possession and may also recover actual damages, reasonable attorney fees, and court costs, unless the tenant proves by a preponderance of the evidence that the failure of the tenant to vacate the dwelling unit as of the termination date was reasonable. The landlord may include in the rental agreement a reasonable liquidated damage penalty, not to exceed an amount equal to 150 percent of the per diem of the monthly rent, for each day the tenant remains in the dwelling unit after the termination date specified in the landlord’s notice. However, if the dwelling unit is a public housing unit or other housing unit subject to regulation by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development, any liquidated damage penalty shall not exceed an amount equal to the per diem of the monthly rent set out in the lease agreement. If the landlord consents to the tenant’s continued occupancy, §

55.1-1204

applies.

In the event of termination of a rental agreement where the tenant remains in possession with the agreement of the landlord either as a hold-over tenant or a month-to-month tenant and no new rental agreement is entered into, the terms of the terminated agreement shall remain in effect and govern the hold-over or month-to-month tenancy, except that the amount of rent shall be either as provided in the terminated rental agreement or the amount set forth in a written notice to the tenant, provided that such new rent amount shall not take effect until the next rent due date coming 30 days after the notice.

History.

1974, c. 680, § 55-248.37; 1977, c. 427; 1982, c. 260; 2004, c. 123; 2005, c. 805; 2009, c. 663; 2013, c. 563; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1254.
Disposal of property abandoned by tenants.

If any items of personal property are left in the dwelling unit, the premises, or any storage area provided by the landlord after the rental agreement has terminated and delivery of possession has occurred, the landlord may consider such property to be abandoned. The landlord may dispose of the property so abandoned as the landlord sees fit or appropriate, provided that he has given (i) a termination notice to the tenant in accordance with this chapter, including a statement that any items of personal property left in the dwelling unit or the premises would be disposed of within the 24-hour period after termination; (ii) written notice to the tenant in accordance with §

55.1-1249

, including a statement that any items of personal property left in the dwelling unit, the premises, or the storage area would be disposed of within the 24-hour period after expiration of the seven-day notice period; or (iii) a separate written notice to the tenant, including a statement that any items of personal property left in the dwelling unit, the premises, or the storage area would be disposed of within 24 hours after expiration of a 10-day period from the date such notice was given to the tenant. Any written notice to the tenant shall be given in accordance with §

55.1-1202

. The tenant shall have the right to remove his personal property from the dwelling unit, the premises, or the storage area at reasonable times during the 24-hour period after termination or at such other reasonable times until the landlord has disposed of the remaining personal property of the tenant.

During the 24-hour period and until the landlord disposes of the remaining personal property of the tenant, the landlord shall not have any liability for the risk of loss for such personal property. If the landlord fails to allow reasonable access to the tenant to remove his personal property as provided in this section, the tenant shall have a right to injunctive or other relief as provided by law. If the landlord received any funds from any sale of abandoned property as provided in this section, the landlord shall pay such funds to the account of the tenant and apply the funds to any amounts due the landlord by the tenant, including the reasonable costs incurred by the landlord in selling, storing, or safekeeping such property. If any such funds are remaining after application, the remaining funds shall be treated as a security deposit under the provisions of §

55.1-1226

. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable if the landlord has been granted an order of possession for the premises in accordance with Title 8.01 and execution of a writ of eviction has been completed pursuant to §

8.01-470

.

Nothing in this section shall affect the right of a landlord to enforce an inchoate or perfected lien of the landlord on the personal property of a tenant in a dwelling unit or on the premises leased to such tenant and the right of a landlord to distress, levy, and seize such personal property as otherwise provided by law.

History.

1984, c. 741, § 55-248.38:1; 1995, c. 228; 1998, c. 461; 2000, c. 760; 2002, c. 762; 2013, c. 563; 2017, c. 730; 2019, cc. 180, 700, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 180 and 700 amended § 55-248.38:1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “granted an order of possession” for “granted a writ of possession” and “a writ of eviction” for “such writ” in the last sentence of the second paragraph.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1255.
Authority of sheriffs to store and sell personal property removed from residential premises; recovery of possession by owner; disposition or sale.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

8.01-156

, when personal property is removed from a dwelling unit, the premises, or any storage area provided by the landlord pursuant to an action of unlawful detainer or ejectment, or pursuant to any other action in which personal property is removed from the dwelling unit in order to restore the dwelling unit to the person entitled to such dwelling unit, the sheriff shall oversee the removal of such personal property to be placed into the public way. The tenant shall have the right to remove his personal property from the public way during the 24-hour period after eviction. Upon the expiration of the 24-hour period after eviction, the landlord shall remove, or dispose of, any such personal property remaining in the public way.

At the landlord’s request, any personal property removed pursuant to this section shall be placed into a storage area designated by the landlord, which may be the dwelling unit. The tenant shall have the right to remove his personal property from the landlord’s designated storage area at reasonable times during the 24 hours after eviction or at such other reasonable times until the landlord has disposed of the property as provided in this section. During that 24-hour period and until the landlord disposes of the remaining personal property of the tenant, the landlord and the sheriff shall not have any liability for the risk of loss for such personal property. If the landlord fails to allow reasonable access to the tenant to remove his personal property as provided in this section, the tenant shall have a right to injunctive or other relief as otherwise provided by law.

Any property remaining in the landlord’s storage area upon the expiration of the 24-hour period after eviction may be disposed of by the landlord as the landlord sees fit or appropriate. If the landlord receives any funds from any sale of such remaining property, the landlord shall pay such funds to the account of the tenant and apply the funds to any amounts due the landlord by the tenant, including the reasonable costs incurred by the landlord in the eviction process described in this section or the reasonable costs incurred by the landlord in selling or storing such property. If any funds are remaining after application, the remaining funds shall be treated as a security deposit under the provisions of §

55.1-1226

.

The notice posted by the sheriff with the writ of eviction setting the date and time of the eviction, pursuant to §

8.01-470

, shall provide notice to the tenant of the rights afforded to tenants in this section and shall include a copy of this statute attached to, or made a part of, the notice.

History.

2001, c. 222, § 55-248.38:2; 2006, c. 129; 2013, c. 563; 2019, cc. 180, 700, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2019, cc. 180 and
700 amended
§ 55-248.38:2 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152 and Acts
2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by inserting “with the writ of eviction” preceding “setting the date” in the last paragraph.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Editor’s note. —

The opinion cited below refers to prior law.

Treatment of firearms and alcohol by sheriff when storing personal property removed from a residential premises pursuant to unlawful detainer or ejectment. —

When storing personal property removed from a residential premises pursuant to unlawful detainer or ejectment, a sheriff may properly inspect firearms found on the premises and ensure that they are not loaded and may also dispose of open alcohol containers. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John R. Newhart, Sheriff for the City of Chesapeake, 01-068,
(4/2/02).

Procedures related to firearms during eviction process. —

Sheriff's office does not have authority to confiscate a firearm during the process set forth in §

55.1-1255

, absent exceptional circumstances, unless the landlord requests assistance in storing the firearm during the 24-hour post-eviction period. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Donald T. Sloan, Sheriff of the City of Lynchburg, 21-051,
(10/15/21).

Neither the landlord nor the tenant has a reasonable expectation of privacy in a firearm located on the premises during the 24-hour period after eviction, and therefore Sheriff's office does have the authority to run the firearm's serial number through VCIN during the removal and storage process. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Donald T. Sloan, Sheriff of the City of Lynchburg, 21-051,
(10/15/21).

Sheriff's office may check the criminal history of the landlord prior to leaving a firearm with the landlord pursuant to an eviction to ensure that landlord is not a convicted felon or under the restrictions of a protective order. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Donald T. Sloan, Sheriff of the City of Lynchburg, 21-051,
(10/15/21).

In restoring the firearm to the possession of the tenant after the 24-hour period following its removal pursuant to an eviction, sheriff's office should follow procedures in §§

15.2-1719

and

15.2-1721

. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Donald T. Sloan, Sheriff of the City of Lynchburg, 21-051,
(10/15/21).

§ 55.1-1256.
Disposal of property of deceased tenants.

If a tenant who is the sole tenant under a written rental agreement still residing in the dwelling unit dies, and there is no person authorized by order of the circuit court to handle probate matters for the deceased tenant, the landlord may dispose of the personal property left in the dwelling unit or upon the premises. However, the landlord shall give at least 10 days’ written notice to (i) the person identified in the rental application, lease agreement, or other landlord document as the authorized person to contact in the event of the death or emergency of the tenant or (ii) the tenant in accordance with §

55.1-1202

if no such person is identified in the rental application, lease agreement, or other landlord document as the authorized contact person. The notice given under clause (i) or (ii) shall include a statement that any items of personal property left in the premises would be treated as abandoned property and disposed of in accordance with the provisions of §

55.1-1254

, if not claimed within 10 days. Authorized occupants, or guests or invitees, are not allowed to occupy the dwelling unit after the death of the sole remaining tenant and shall vacate the dwelling unit prior to the end of the 10-day period.

The landlord may request that such authorized contact person provide reasonable proof of identification. Thereafter, the authorized contact person identified in the rental application, lease agreement, or other landlord document may (i) have access to the dwelling unit or the premises and to the tenant records maintained by the landlord and (ii) rightfully claim the personal property of the deceased tenant and otherwise handle the affairs of the deceased tenant with the landlord.

The rental agreement is deemed to be terminated by the landlord as of the date of death of the tenant who is the sole tenant under a written rental agreement still residing in the dwelling unit, and the landlord shall not be required to seek an order of possession from a court of competent jurisdiction. The estate of the tenant shall remain liable for actual damages under §

55.1-1251

, and the landlord shall mitigate such damages.

History.

2006, c. 820, § 55-248.38:3; 2010, c. 550; 2011, c. 766; 2014, c. 813; 2017, c. 730; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-1257.
Who may recover rent or possession.

Notwithstanding any rule of court to the contrary, (i) any person licensed under the provisions of §

54.1-2106.1

, (ii) any property manager or the managing agent of a landlord as defined in §

55.1-1200

pursuant to the written property management agreement, or (iii) any employee, who is authorized in writing by a corporate officer with the approval of the board of directors, or by a manager, a general partner, or a trustee, of a partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, limited partnership, professional corporation, professional limited liability company, registered limited liability partnership, registered limited liability limited partnership, business trust, or family trust to sign pleadings as the agent of the business entity may obtain a judgment (a) for possession in the general district court for the county or city in which the premises, or part thereof, is situated or (b) for rent or damages, including actual damages for breach of the rental agreement, or for final rent and damages under §

8.01-128

, in any general district court where venue is proper under Chapter 5 (§

8.01-257

et seq.) of Title 8.01, against any defendant if the person seeking such judgment had a contractual agreement with the landlord to manage the premises for which rent or possession is due and may prepare, execute, file, and have served on other parties in any general district court a warrant in debt, suggestion for summons in garnishment, garnishment summons, order of possession, writ of eviction, or writ of fieri facias arising out of a landlord-tenant relationship. However, the activities of any such person in court shall be limited by the provisions of § 16.1-88.03. However, nothing shall be construed as preventing a nonlawyer from requesting relief from the court as provided by law or statute when such nonlawyer is before the court on one of the actions specified herein.

History.

1983, c. 8, § 55-246.1; 1989, c. 612; 1998, c. 452; 2003, cc. 665, 667; 2004, cc. 338, 365; 2010, c. 550; 2013, c. 563; 2015, c. 190; 2018, c. 221; 2019, cc. 180, 477, 700, 712.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 180 and 700 amended § 55-246.1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by substituting “order of possession, writ of eviction” for “writ of possession.”

Acts 2019, c. 477 amended § 55-246.1 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2019, c. 712, the 2019 amendment has been given effect in clause (ii) by substituting “any property manager or the managing agent” for “any property manager, or a managing agent” and adding “pursuant to the written property management agreement” at the end.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.